Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-115
Chase.

The county of Chase is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point where the first standard parallel intersects the west boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range thirty-six; thence north to the northeast corner of township eight, north, of range thirty-six; thence west to the west boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 67, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 828;

C.S.1922, § 730;

C.S.1929, § 25-117;

R.S.1943, § 22-115.